Maryland, session 2026, SB0833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 20–706 of Article – Local Government of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be renumbered to be Section(s) 20–707.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Local Government
20–706.
IN ADDITION TO THE USES OF REVENUE FROM DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEES
AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR A PUBLIC LOCAL LAW, THE COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS OF QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY MAY ALSO USE THE REVENUE FROM A
DEVELOPMENT IMPACT FEE TO FINANCE ANY CAPITAL COSTS RELATED TO THE
REPLACEMENT OF PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITIES.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
– 1 –

Ch. 586 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –